Missouri, session 2026, HB2738.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 444.771, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 444.771, to read as follows:
444.771. [Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the commission
and the department shall not issue any permits under this chapter or under chapters 643or 644
to any person whose mine plan boundary is within one thousand feet of any real property
where an accredited school has been located for at least five years prior to such application for
permits made under these provisions, except that the provisions of this section shall not apply
to any request for an expansion to an existing mine or to any underground mining operation]
No operation that refines cobalt, lithium, rare earth elements, lead, zinc, nickel,
cadmium, manganese, iron, or silver, or manufactures or recycles products that contain
these elements, shall occur within one mile of any wildlife refuge designated by the
Missouri conservation commission under 3 CSR 10-12.105, surface water as defined
under section 640.403, state conservation area, state park, public land as defined by 43
U.S.C. Section 1702(e), park in the National Parks System under 54 U.S.C. Section
100101 et seq., residence, or school. This section shall not apply to mines, refineries,
manufacturing plants, or recycling plants in full operation on August 28, 2026.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.